Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 4
MINERAL RESOURCES AND CAVES

Article 1

General Provisions.

Article 2

Mining and Drilling.

Part 1

O

IL WELL REWARD

.

Part 2

D

EEP DRILLING FOR OIL, GAS, AND OTHER MINERALS

.

Part 3

S

URFACE MINING

.

Article 3

Phosphates and Gold.

Part 1

P

HOSPHATES

.

Part 2

G

OLD

.

Article 4

Cave Protection.

Cross references.

- Regulation of sale and storage of liquefied petroleum gas,

§

10-1-260

et seq.